Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
ARTICLE 30.5
FIRE - POLICE - OLD HIRE PENSION PLANS

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 1996 containing provisions of some sections formerly located in parts 3 to 10 of article 30 of this title. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 ADMINISTRATION

PART 3 FUNDING - STATE-ASSISTED PLANS

PART 4 FUNDING - NONSTATE
ASSISTED PLANS

PART 5 INVESTMENTS - INSURANCE

PART 6 RETIREMENT BENEFITS

PART 7 DISABILITY AND
SURVIVOR BENEFITS

PART 8 EXEMPT PLANS